Washington statutes.
RCW 4.08.180

Action to determine conflicting claims to property—Trial of issue.

Either of the defendants may set up or show any claim or lien he or she may have to such property, money, or indebtedness, or any part thereof, and the superior right, title, or lien, whether legal or equitable, shall prevail.

The court or judge thereof may make all necessary orders, during the pendency of said action, for the preservation and protection of the rights, interests, or liens of the several parties.

[ 2011 c 336 s 78; 1890 p 94 s 3; RRS s 201.]